Ohio, session 136, HB928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2108.18, 2108.99, and 2919.14 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2108.18. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(C) of this section, no person shall knowingly, for valuable consideration, knowingly purchase or sell a part for transplantation or therapy if removal of a part from an individual is intended to occur after the individual's death. (B) A Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, no person shall receive or provide any consideration, as defined in section 2919.14 of the Revised Code, for the product of human conception resulting from an abortion. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, a person may charge a reasonable amount for the removal, processing, preservation, quality control, storage, transportation, implantation, or disposal of a part. (2) No person shall receive any reimbursement for expenses related to the removal, processing, preservation, quality control, storage, or transportation of a product of human conception resulting from an abortion. (D) Any provision of the Revised Code that authorizes reimbursement or the exchange of consideration for human tissue shall be construed not to apply to the product of human conception resulting from an abortion. Sec. 2108.99. Whoever violates division (A) of section 2108.18 or section 2108.19 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the third degree. Sec. 2919.14. (A) As used in this section, "consideration" means any payment, compensation, remuneration, or thing of value, whether direct or indirect, including reimbursement for costs, fees, or expenses. (B) No person shall experiment knowingly do any of the following: (1) Experiment upon or sell the product of human conception which is aborted. Experiment does not include autopsies pursuant to sections 313.13 and 2108.50 of the Revised Code. (B) (2) Sell, transfer, distribute, or otherwise convey for consideration the product of human conception resulting from an abortion; (3) Offer, advertise, or hold oneself out as willing to engage in conduct described in division (B)(2) of this section; (4) Facilitate, broker, or arrange a transaction involving the product of human conception resulting from an abortion for consideration. (C) It is not a defense to a violation of this section that the consideration exchanged under division (B) of this section was characterized as reimbursement for storage, processing, handling, transportation, preservation, or any other cost or expense. (D) Whoever violates this section is guilty of abortion trafficking, a misdemeanor felony of the first third degree. Notwithstanding section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, there is a presumption in favor of a prison term for a violation of this section. Section 2. That existing sections 2108.18, 2108.99, and 2919.14 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.